District of Columbia statutes.
23-555

Reports concerning intercepted wire or oral communications.

(a)

Within thirty days after the expiration of an order or an extension entered under section 23-547 or 23-548 or the denial of an order of approval, the issuing or denying court shall report to the chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals —

(1)

that an order or extension was applied for;

(2)

the kind of order or extension applied for;

(3)

if the order or extension was granted as applied for, was modified, or was denied;

(4)

the period of the interceptions authorized by the order, and the number and duration of any extensions of the order;

(5)

the offense specified in the order or application, or extension of an order;

(6)

the identity of the applying investigative or law enforcement officer, the agency making the application, and the person authorizing the application; and

(7)

the character and location of the facilities from which and the place where communications were (and were to be) intercepted.

(b)

In January of each year the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia shall report to the Congress of the United States and the chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals —

(1)

the information required by paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a) of this section with respect to each application for an order or extension made during the immediately preceding calendar year;

(2)

a general description of the interceptions made under such order or extension, including —

(A)

the approximate character and frequency of incriminating communications intercepted;

(B)

the approximate character and frequency of other communications intercepted;

(C)

the approximate number of persons whose communications were intercepted; and

(D)

the approximate character, amount, and cost of the manpower and other resources used in the interceptions;

(3)

the number of arrests resulting from interceptions made under such order or extension;

(4)

the offenses for which the arrests were made;

(5)

the number of trials resulting from such interceptions;

(6)

the number of motions to suppress made with respect to such interceptions;

(7)

the number of motions to suppress granted or denied;

(8)

the number of convictions resulting from such interceptions;

(9)

the offenses for which the convictions were obtained;

(10)

a general assessment of the importance of the interceptions; and

(11)

for purposes of comparison, the information required by paragraphs (2) through (10) of this subsection with respect to orders and extensions obtained in other preceding calendar years.

(c)

Reports made pursuant to the section shall be made in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Director of the Administration Office of the United States Courts under section 2519(3) of Title 18, United States Code.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 626, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 14(d), 44 DCR 1408

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-556.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-555.
1973 Ed., § 23-555.